New York, session 2025-2026, S9258.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "facial identification and transparency in immigration enforcement 3 act". 4 § 2. Legislative findings and intent. The legislature finds that 5 ensuring transparency and accountability in immigration enforcement 6 actions conducted within the state of New York is essential to public 7 safety and the protection of civil liberties. The use of unmarked agents 8 or masked individuals by federal agencies without clearly identifying 9 themselves contributes to fear, confusion, and potential violations of 10 constitutional rights. The purpose of this legislation is to ensure that 11 all individuals have the right to know who is conducting enforcement 12 actions and to protect the integrity of law enforcement procedures in 13 the state. 14 § 3. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 94-c to read 15 as follows: 16 § 94-c. Requirements for federal immigration enforcement activity. 1. 17 No agent, officer, or contractor acting on behalf of United States immi- 18 gration and customs enforcement (ICE) or any other federal immigration 19 enforcement agency shall conduct any enforcement activity within the 20 state of New York unless such agent, officer, or contractor: 21 (a) clearly displays a valid and current federal identification badge 22 and credentials which are visible to the individual or individuals 23 subject to enforcement; and 24 (b) does not obscure or conceal such officer, agent, or contractor's 25 face with a mask, shield, or any other facial covering unless required 26 for safety due to an imminent and articulable threat or as advised 27 following a public health emergency declared under state or federal law. 28 2. Any federal immigration enforcement officer, agent, or contractor 29 operating in New York shall, upon request by any individual subject to EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13441-01-5 S. 9258 2 1 such enforcement activity or any member of a state law enforcement agen- 2 cy, provide such officer, agent, or contractor's name, agency, and badge 3 number. 4 3. Any state or local law enforcement agency, officer, or employee who 5 becomes aware of a violation of this section shall document and report 6 such violation to the office of the New York state attorney general 7 within forty-eight hours. The department shall establish a telephone 8 hotline and may establish an internet form for members of the public to 9 report such violations. 10 4. The attorney general shall have the authority to investigate any 11 violations of this section and may bring a civil action for injunctive 12 relief or penalties, including a fine of up to five thousand dollars per 13 violation. 14 § 4. The criminal procedure law is amended by adding a new section 15 60.80 to read as follows: 16 § 60.80 Admissibility of evidence obtained by federal immigration agents 17 in violation of state transparency laws. 18 1. Any evidence obtained during an enforcement action by a federal 19 immigration enforcement agent who fails to comply with section ninety- 20 four-c of the executive law shall be presumptively inadmissible in any 21 criminal proceeding within New York state courts. 22 2. This section shall not apply to evidence obtained independently by 23 lawful means or if the court finds that such exclusion would result in 24 manifest injustice. 25 § 5. The civil practice law and rules is amended by adding a new 26 section 4552 to read as follows: 27 § 4552. Admissibility of evidence obtained by federal immigration 28 agents in violation of state transparency laws. 1. Any evidence 29 obtained during an enforcement action by a federal immigration enforce- 30 ment agent who fails to comply with section ninety-four-c of the execu- 31 tive law shall be presumptively inadmissible in any civil proceeding 32 within New York state courts. 33 2. This section shall not apply to evidence obtained independently by 34 lawful means or if the court finds that such exclusion would result in 35 manifest injustice. 36 § 6. Section 306 of the state administrative procedure act is amended 37 by adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 38 5. (a) Any evidence obtained during an enforcement action by a federal 39 immigration enforcement agent who fails to comply with section ninety- 40 four-c of the executive law shall be presumptively inadmissible in any 41 criminal proceeding within New York state courts. 42 (b) This subdivision shall not apply to evidence obtained independent- 43 ly by lawful means or if the court finds that such exclusion would 44 result in manifest injustice. 45 § 7. Severability. If any provision of this act or its application to 46 any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or 47 the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall 48 not be affected. 49 § 8. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 50 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 51 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 52 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 53 completed on or before such effective date.